New York, session 2025-2026, A4816.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 794 of the general business law, 2 as amended by chapter 301 of the laws of 2000, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Prior to the expiration of a certificate of registration and as a 5 condition of renewal, each hearing aid dispenser registered pursuant to 6 subdivision one of section seven hundred ninety of this article shall 7 submit documentation showing successful completion of twenty continuing 8 education credits through a course or courses approved by the secretary 9 in consultation with the advisory board, or, in relation to audiologists 10 licensed pursuant to article one hundred fifty-nine of the education 11 law, the office of the professions in the education department. Such 12 formal courses of learning shall include, but not be limited to, colle- 13 giate level of credit in non-credit courses, professional development 14 programs and technical sessions offered by national, state and local 15 professional associations and other organizations acceptable to the 16 secretary and any other organized educational and technical programs 17 acceptable to the secretary. The secretary may, in [his or her] such 18 secretary's discretion, and as needed to contribute to the health and 19 welfare of the public, require the completion of continuing education 20 courses in specific subjects to fulfill this mandatory continuing educa- 21 tion requirement. Courses shall be taken from a sponsor approved by the 22 secretary pursuant to regulations promulgated pursuant to this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08809-02-5 A. 4816--A 2 1 Courses may be completed online, provided that such online course meets 2 the requirements of this section and is approved by the secretary. 3 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 791 of the general 4 business law, as added by chapter 599 of the laws of 1998, is amended to 5 read as follows: 6 (b) continuing education including but not limited to (i) the content 7 of such course of study, (ii) the procedures for approval of such course 8 of study [and], (iii) those individuals and organizations who may 9 permissibly offer such continuing education course or courses provided 10 for in section seven hundred ninety-four of this article, and (iv) the 11 format of such course of study when such course is given in an online 12 setting; 13 § 3. Section 444-q of the real property law is renumbered section 14 444-r and a new section 444-q is added to read as follows: 15 § 444-q. Continuing education. Continuing education courses required 16 for licensure pursuant to section four hundred forty-four-f of this 17 article may be completed online provided that such course is approved by 18 the secretary. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 21 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 22 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 23 completed on or before such effective date.